test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-complex_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Pronouns - all kinds of: # Pronouns - full paradigms
     # according to Filosoft's analyses

     #
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Gen: üksteise
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Par: üksteist
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Ill: [üksteisesse, üksteise]
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Ine: üksteises
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Ela: üksteisest
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+All: üksteisele
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Ade: üksteisel
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Abl: üksteiselt
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Tra: üksteiseks
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Trm: üksteiseni
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Ess: üksteisena
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Abe: üksteiseta
     üksteise+Pron+Sg+Com: üksteisega
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Nom: üksteised
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Gen: üksteiste
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Par: üksteisi
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Ill: üksteistesse
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Ine: üksteistes
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Ela: üksteistest
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+All: üksteistele
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Ade: üksteistel
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Abl: üksteistelt
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Tra: üksteisteks
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Trm: üksteisteni
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Ess: üksteistena
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Abe: üksteisteta
     üksteise+Pron+Pl+Com: üksteistega
     #
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Gen: teineteise
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Par: teineteist
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Ill: [teineteisesse, teineteise]
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Ine: teineteises
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Ela: teineteisest
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+All: teineteisele
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Ade: teineteisel
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Abl: teineteiselt
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Tra: teineteiseks
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Trm: teineteiseni
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Ess: teineteisena
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Abe: teineteiseta
     teineteise+Pron+Sg+Com: teineteisega
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Nom: teineteised
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Gen: teineteiste
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Par: teineteisi
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Ill: teineteistesse
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Ine: teineteistes
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Ela: teineteistest
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+All: teineteistele
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Ade: teineteistel
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Abl: teineteistelt
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Tra: teineteisteks
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Trm: teineteisteni
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Ess: teineteistena
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Abe: teineteisteta
     teineteise+Pron+Pl+Com: teineteistega
     #
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: eikeegi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: eikellegi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Par: eikedagi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: eikellessegi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: eikelleski
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: eikellestki
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All: eikellelegi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: eikellelgi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: eikelleltki
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: eikellekski
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: eikellenigi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: eikellenagi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: eikelletagi
     eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com: eikellegagi
     #
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Nom: eimiski
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen: eimillegi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par: eimidagi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill: eimillessegi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine: eimilleski
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela: eimillestki
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+All: eimillelegi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade: eimillelgi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl: eimilleltki
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra: eimillekski
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm: eimillenigi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess: eimillenagi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe: eimilletagi
     eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com: eimillegagi
     #
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesama
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Gen: sellesama
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Par: sedasama
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sellessesamasse, sessesamasse]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Ine: [sellessamas, sessamas]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Ela: [sellestsamast, sestsamast]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+All: sellelesamale
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Ade: [sellelsamal, selsamal]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Abl: [selleltsamalt, seltsamalt]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Tra: [sekssamaks, sellekssamaks]
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Trm: sellesamani
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellesamana
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Abe: sellesamata
     seesama+Pron+Sg+Com: sellesamaga
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Nom: needsamad
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesamade
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Par: neidsamu
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendessesamadesse, neissesamusse]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendessamades, neissamus]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendestsamadest, neistsamust]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+All: nendelesamadele
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendelsamadel, neilsamul]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendeltsamadelt, neiltsamult]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendekssamadeks, neikssamuks]
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesamadeni
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesamadena
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesamadeta
     seesama+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesamadega
     #
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Nom: toosama
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Gen: tollesama
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Par: todasama
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Ill: tollessesamasse
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Ine: tollessamas
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Ela: tollestsamast
     toosama+Pron+Sg+All: tollelesamale
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Ade: [tollelsamal, tolsamal]
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Abl: tolleltsamalt
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Tra: tollekssamaks
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Trm: tollesamani
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Ess: tollesamana
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Abe: tollesamata
     toosama+Pron+Sg+Com: tollesamaga
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Nom: noodsamad
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Gen: nondesamade
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Par: noidsamu
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nondessesamadesse, noissesamusse]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nondessamades, noissamus]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nondestsamadest, noistsamust]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+All: nondelesamadele
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nondelsamadel, noilsamul]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nondeltsamadelt, noiltsamult]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nondekssamadeks, noikssamuks]
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondesamadeni
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondesamadena
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondesamadeta
     toosama+Pron+Pl+Com: nondesamadega
     #
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Nom: igaüks
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Gen: igaühe
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Par: [igaühte, igaüht]
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Ill: [igaühte, igaühesse]
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Ine: igaühes
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Ela: igaühest
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+All: igaühele
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Ade: igaühel
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Abl: igaühelt
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Tra: igaüheks
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Trm: igaüheni
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Ess: igaühena
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Abe: igaüheta
     igaüks+Pron+Sg+Com: igaühega
     #
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Nom: niimitu
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Gen: niimitme
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Par: niimitut
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Ill: niimitmesse
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Ine: niimitmes
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Ela: niimitmest
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+All: niimitmele
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Ade: niimitmel
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Abl: niimitmelt
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Tra: niimitmeks
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Trm: niimitmeni
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Ess: niimitmena
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Abe: niimitmeta
     niimitu+Pron+Sg+Com: niimitmega
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Nom: niimitmed
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Gen: niimitmete
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Par: niimitmeid
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Ill: [niimitmetesse, niimitmeisse]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Ine: [niimitmetes, niimitmeis]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Ela: [niimitmetest, niimitmeist]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+All: [niimitmetele, niimitmeile]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Ade: [niimitmetel, niimitmeil]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Abl: [niimitmetelt, niimitmeilt]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Tra: [niimitmeteks, niimitmeiks]
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Trm: niimitmeteni
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Ess: niimitmetena
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Abe: niimitmeteta
     niimitu+Pron+Pl+Com: niimitmetega
     #
